el: Μέθοδος διαμόρφωσης: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; Άλλο
zh-TW: 調變方法: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; 其他
nl: Modulatiemethode: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; Andere
th: วิธีการมอดูเลต: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; อื่นๆ
en: Modulation method: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; Other
fi: Modulaatiomenetelmä: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; Muu
da: Modulationsmetode: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; Andet
es: Método de modulación: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; Otros
ko: 변조 방식: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; 기타
sk-SK: Modulačná metóda: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; Iné
pt-BR: Método de modulação: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; Outro
hu: Modulációs módszer: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; Egyéb
ja: 変調方式: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; その他
vi: Phương pháp điều chế: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; Khác
nb: Modulasjonsmetode: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; Annet
ru: Метод модуляции: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; Другой
ro-RO: Metodă de modulație: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; Altele
de: Modulationsmethode: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; Sonstiges
it: Metodo di modulazione: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; Altro
hr-HR: Metoda modulacije: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; Ostalo
lt-LT: Moduliacijos būdas: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; Kita
cs: Metoda modulace: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; Jiné
fr: Méthode de modulation: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; Autre
pl: Metoda modulacji: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; Inne
pt-PT: Método de modulação: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; Outro
sl-SI: Metoda modulacije: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; Drugo
zh-CN: 调制方法: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; 其他
bg-BG: Метод на модулация: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; Други
tr: Modülasyon Yöntemi: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; Diğer
sv: Moduleringsmetod: AM; FM; GFSK; OFDM; PAM; PCM; PM; PPM; PWM; QAM; Övrigt